Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.445

Resignation of registered agent.

(1) A registered agent may resign as agent for a represented entity by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation executed by the agent which states:

(a) The name of the entity;

(b) The name of the agent;

(c) That the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the entity; and

(d) The address of the entity to which the agent will send the notice required by subsection (3) of this section.

(2) A statement of resignation takes effect on the earlier of:

(a) The 31st day after the day on which it is filed by the secretary of state; or

(b) The designation of a new registered agent for the represented entity.

(3) A registered agent promptly shall furnish to the represented entity notice in a record of the date on which a statement of resignation was filed.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1410.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.